The correlation between optical coherence tomographic features and severity of retinopathy, macular thickness and visual acuity in diabetic macular edema.To investigate the correlation between the features of optical coherence tomography (OCT) and the severity of concurrent retinopathy, central macular thickness (CMT), and best-corrected visual acuity in clinically significant diabetic macular edema.In a prospective study, OCT was performed in 55 eyes of 55 patients with clinically significant diabetic macular edema, in 58 eyes of 30 patients with diabetes without retinopathy, and in 40 eyes of 21 healthy control subjects. The OCT features were categorized into: type 1, sponge-like retinal swelling; type 2, cystoid macular edema; type 3, serous retinal detachment; and type 4, vitreofoveal traction.The CMT in eyes with diabetic macular edema was significantly higher than in eyes of healthy controls or in eyes of diabetic patients without retinopathy (P < 0.001). Visual acuity correlated with CMT in diabetic macular edema (r = 0.558, P < 0.001). The prevalence of OCT type 1 was significantly higher in eyes with mild-to-moderate non-proliferative retinopathy (NPDR) than in eyes with severe NPDR to proliferative retinopathy (PDR) (P = 0.0069). The prevalence of OCT types 3 and 4 was significantly higher in eyes with severe NPDR to PDR than in eyes with mild-to-moderate NPDR (P = 0.0056). OCT type 1 showed the least CMT (P < 0.001) and the best visual acuity (P = 0.002).There was a significant correlation between OCT patterns of clinically significant diabetic macular edema and severity of retinopathy, CMT, and visual acuity.Correlation between central subfield thickness, visual acuity and structural changes in diabetic macular edema.To correlate the central subfield thickness (CST) measured by Cirrus™ SD-OCT with best-corrected visual acuity (BCVA) and structural changes in diabetic macular edema (DME).The transversal study evaluated 200 patients with non-proliferative diabetic retinopathy (NPDR) and selected 55 eyes with DME between January, 2010 and April, 2011. Spectral domain OCT was performed in patients with type 2 diabetes and DME. CST and BCVA were correlated with the edema morphology and the ELM (external limiting membrane) integrity. Statistical tests were applied to validate the results.There was no difference between genders in the NPDR classification. 47.3% of the patients showed moderate NPDR. The CST average for male was of 393.58 µm and 434.16 µm for female, with no statistically significant difference. The patients with continuous ELM showed lower CST average (368.73 µm) than those with disrupted ELM (521.43 µm). There was a strong correlation between the macular volume and CST (59.63%), but poor correlation between age and CST (2.9%). Also, there was a significant difference between the average CST and the type of macular edema. Patients with serous detachment showed higher CST average (488.71 µm) than those with cystoid macular edema (CME) and diffuse edema. Patients with severe NPDR showed higher CST average (491.45 µm), if compared to mild and moderate NPDR. Cystoid macular edema was the most common type of edema (49.1%) and showed the worse VA. Patients with disrupted ELM showed worse BCVA. Patients with higher CST showed worse BCVA. There was a significant difference between the CST average of the case group (407.6 ± 113,1 µm) and the control group (diabetic patients without DME: 252 ± 12.5 µm). There was also a significant difference in the BCVA variables and macular volume between case and control groups.The study suggests that the CST of diabetic patients with edema is higher than the control group, the increase in CST of diabetic patients with edema leads to worsening of BCVA and macular volume. Continuous ELM showed lower CST average, and the serous detachment showed higher CST average. Cirrus™ proved to be an important tool in the DME evaluation.The association between percent disruption of the photoreceptor inner segment-outer segment junction and visual acuity in diabetic macular edema.To evaluate the integrity of the photoreceptor inner segment/outer segment (IS/OS) junction using spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD OCT) in patients with diabetic macular edema and to correlate the relationship between the integrity of the IS/OS junction and visual acuity.Retrospective, comparative, consecutive case series.Sixty-two eyes from 38 patients with diabetic macular edema underwent SD OCT imaging. For each patient, 2 experienced observers masked to visual acuity measured several SD OCT variables, including central macular thickness, retinal volume, global disruption scale of outer retina, percentage disruption of the outer retina, and history of previous treatments. Visual acuity recorded as number of Early Treatment Diabetic Retinopathy Study letters was used as the outcome variable in univariate and multivariate analysis testing the measured SD OCT variables as predictors.A statistically significant correlation between percentage disruption of the IS/OS junction and visual acuity was found (P = .0312). Additionally, there was a strong trend suggesting a relationship between macular volume and visual acuity, although borderline significance was found (P = .07).Disruption of the photoreceptor IS/OS junction is an important predictor of visual acuity among diabetic macular edema patients.A systematic correlation between morphology and functional alterations in diabetic macular edema.The aim of this study was to correlate different types of retinal morphologic alterations secondary to diabetic macular disease with their characteristic impact on retinal function.In the present cross-sectional study, 26 eyes of 26 diabetic patients with clinically significant macular edema were examined. All patients underwent complete standardized ophthalmologic examination, including SD-OCT and microperimetry. Microperimetric values were projected over the scanning laser ophthalmoscope image of the OCT device, allowing direct correlation of functional and morphologic parameters. Results over all 1066 individual areas were analyzed using a general linear model.All the characteristic morphologic alterations demonstrated a significant effect on retinal function (P < 0.0002), except for outer nuclear layer (ONL) hyporeflectivity and small ONL cysts. Large ONL cysts (>220 μm) and serous retinal detachment had the greatest estimated negative effect on retinal sensitivity (-3.86 and -3.66 dB), followed by medium-sized ONL cysts, hard exudates associated with an extinction of the scan signal, and inner nuclear layer cysts.In diabetic macular edema, serous retinal detachment and large ONL cysts are the two morphologic changes with the greatest negative impact on retinal function.Quantitative assessment of retinal thickness in diabetic patients with and without clinically significant macular edema using optical coherence tomography.To assess patients with diabetic macular edema quantitatively using optical coherence tomography (OCT).OCT was performed in 14 eyes with diabetic retinopathy and ophthalmoscopic evidence of clinically significant macular edema (CSME) and in 19 diabetic eyes without CSME. Retinal thickness was computed from the tomograms at fovea and other 36 locations throughout the macula.The mean +/- standard deviation foveal thickness was 255.6 +/- 138.9 microm in eyes with CSME, and 174.6 +/- 38.2 microm in eyes without CSME (p = 0.051). Within 2000 microm of the center of the macula, eyes with CSME had significantly thicker retina in the inferior quadrant than those without CSME (p < 0.01). The foveal thickness was correlated with logMAR visual acuity (gamma = 0.68, p < 0.01). OCT identified sponge-like retinal swelling and/or cystoid macular edema in 11 (58%) eyes without CSME, and in 12 (86%) eyes with CSME.Criteria of CSME seem to be insufficient in really identifying macular edema. OCT may be more sensitive than a clinical examination in assessing diabetic macular edema and is a quantitative tool for documenting changes in macular thickening.Optical coherence tomographic assessment of diabetic macular edema: comparison with fluorescein angiographic and clinical findings.To compare the optical coherence tomographic (OCT) features with clinical and fluorescein angiographic (FA) findings in patients with diabetic retinopathy.In a retrospective study ophthalmologic examination together with FA and OCT images were obtained from 195 eyes of 110 patients with different stages of diabetic retinopathy and OCT images were obtained from 40 eyes of 20 control subjects. Fluorescein leakage characteristics were organized into five groups: no leakage (1), focal (2), diffuse (3), combined focal+diffuse leakage (4) and cystoid (5). The Pearson correlation test was used to test the correlation between visual acuity and central foveal thickness and ANOVA was used for the statistical comparison between the groups.The OCT images demonstrated retinal swelling in 66.1% of eyes, cystoid macular edema (CME) in 11.8% of eyes, serous foveal detachment + swelling in 6.2% of eyes, serous foveal detachment+swelling+CME in 3.6% of eyes and normal foveal structure in 12.3% of eyes. The best-corrected visual acuity was significantly correlated with central foveal thickness (r:-0.528, p<0.01). There was 77% agreement between clinical examination and OCT results. CME was detected with OCT in 15.4% of eyes in our study, 40% of which was not detected with slit-lamp biomicroscopy and 63.3% of which was not evident in FA. None of the serous foveal detachments could be detected during slit-lamp biomicroscopy or FA.OCT-3 provided objective documentation of foveal structural changes in eyes with diabetic retinopathy. Best-corrected visual acuity provided a significant correlation with the retinal thickness at the central fovea. These results indicate that OCT can facilitate deciding on the treatment protocol (surgical or medical) and follow-up of diabetic patients, which is especially important in the early stages of diabetic maculopathy when the structural changes are not yet evident with slit-lamp biomicroscopy or angiographically.Correlation between visual acuity and foveal microstructural changes in diabetic macular edema.The purpose of this study was to investigate the correlation between best-corrected visual acuity and foveal microstructural changes of the external limiting membrane and the junction between the inner and outer segments of the photoreceptors in diabetic macular edema.The authors performed spectral-domain optical coherence tomography in all eyes. The authors defined central subfield thickness as the average retinal thickness of the 1-mm central scanned area. The length of disruption of the external limiting membrane and the inner and outer segments of the photoreceptors in the fovea (1.8 mm in diameter) were measured and graded according to their length as follows: 1) >1.4 mm; 2) >0.4 mm but <1.4 mm; or 3) <0.4 mm.The best-corrected visual acuity was strongly associated with the external limiting membrane (r = 0.66) and inner and outer segments of the photoreceptor (r = 0.68) scores, whereas best-corrected visual acuity was weakly and negatively correlated with central subfield thickness (r = -0.23).Spectral-domain optical coherence tomography showed that the integrity of the external limiting membrane and inner and outer segments of the photoreceptors was more strongly correlated with best-corrected visual acuity when compared with central subfield thickness in diabetic macular edema.Segmentational analysis of retinal thickness after vitrectomy in diabetic macular edema.To measure the inner and outer retinal thicknesses on spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) and evaluate their association with logMAR after vitrectomy for diabetic macular edema (DME).In this retrospective case series, there were 55 consecutive eyes with DME for which vitrectomy was performed. The total retinal thickness, the inner thickness (from the innermost of the retina to the inner nuclear layer), and the outer thickness (from the outer plexiform layer to the retinal pigment epithelium) in the parafoveal subfields were measured manually, and the association with logMAR was evaluated.The total retinal thicknesses in the central, nasal, and inferior subfields were significantly (r = 0.37, P = 0.005; r = 0.29, P = 0.032; r = 0.33, P = 0.015, respectively) associated with the baseline logMAR; no subfield thickness was correlated with the logMAR at the final visit. However, segmentational analysis showed that the outer retinal thickness of the temporal subfield was associated with disruption of the junction between the inner and outer segments at the fovea (P = 0.021 and P = 0.005) and negatively correlated with the logMAR (r = -0.37, P = 0.006 and r = -0.28, P = 0.042) at the 6-month and final visit. The inner thickness of the nasal subfield did not change after vitrectomy compared with the other subfields and the outer thickness of all subfields in the parafoveal area; the baseline nasal total thickness was correlated most significantly with the logMAR (r = 0.40, P = 0.002 and r = 0.37, P = 0.006) at the 6-month and final visits.Segmentational analysis provided useful information for considering the prognosis and pathogenesis after vitrectomy for DME.Diabetic maculopathy induced by vitreo-macular traction: evaluation by optical coherence tomography (OCT).To evaluate the role and efficacy of optical coherence tomography (OCT) in the evaluation of diabetic maculopathy induced by vitreo-retinal traction.12 patients affected by diabetic maculopathy induced by vitreo-retinal traction were examined using biomicroscopy with a three-mirror contact lens, fluorescein angiography (FA) and OCT scanning in order to identify the presence of a vitreomacular traction.OCT revealed two patterns of maculopathy which were characterised by a thickening of the superior profile of the OCT tomogram or by the disappearance and inversion of the physiologic foveal depression respectively.OCT may be useful in the characterisation and monitoring of diabetic maculopathy induced by vitreo-retinal traction.Retinal thickness in diabetic retinopathy: a study using optical coherence tomography (OCT).The authors conducted a controlled study to quantify macular retinal thickness in diabetic retinopathy using optical coherence tomography (OCT) as an objective and noninvasive tool. The relationship between retinal thickness and standard methods of evaluating macular edema was investigated.A total of 136 patients in different stages of diabetic retinopathy were examined with OCT. In addition, fluorescein angiograms as well as standard eye examinations were conducted. The control group consisted of 30 individuals with a normal macula.In the controls, retinal thickness was 153 +/- 15 microm in the fovea, 249 +/- 19 microm in the temporal parafoveal region, and 268 +/- 20 microm in the nasal parafoveal region. In diabetic patients, retinal thickness was increased to 307 +/- 136 microm in the fovea, 337 +/- 88 microm in the temporal retina, and 353 +/- 95 microm in the nasal retina, respectively. The differences between diabetics and controls were highly significant (P < 0.001). Retinal thickening correlated with fluorescein leakage in the angiograms to some extent. There was an intermediate correlation between retinal thickness and visual acuity, particularly in patients without macular ischemia. Sensitivity of detecting clinically significant macular edema by measuring foveal retinal thickness was 89% and specificity was 96%.Optical coherence tomography allows us to quantify retinal thickness in diabetic retinopathy with excellent reproducibility. OCT is able to detect sight-threatening macular edema with great reliability.Diabetic macular edema: correlation between microperimetry and optical coherence tomography findings.To compare the changes in macular sensitivity (microperimetry) and macular thickness with different degrees of diabetic macular edema.Sixty-one eyes of 32 consecutive diabetic patients were included in this cross-sectional study. All included eyes underwent functional and morphologic examination of the macular area. Best corrected visual acuity (ETDRS charts), macular sensitivity, and macular thickness were quantified. Lesion-related macular sensitivity and retinal fixation were investigated with an advanced, automatic microperimeter. Optical coherence tomography (OCT) was used to quantify macular thickness.The 61 included eyes were graded, by two retinal specialists, for diabetic macular edema as follows: 16 were graded as no macular edema (NE), 30 as non-clinically significant macular edema (NCSME), and 15 as clinically significant macular edema (CSME). Macular thickness significantly increased from the NE to the CSME group (P<0.0001), whereas macular sensitivity significantly decreased from the NE to the CSME group (P<0.0021). A significant correlation coefficient was noted between retinal sensitivity and normalized macular thickness (r=-0.37, P<0.0001). Linear regression analysis showed a decrease of 0.83 dB (P<0.0001) for every 10% of deviation of retinal thickness from normal values. Visual acuity and central macular sensitivity correlated significantly in the NCSME group (r=-0.6, P=0.0008), but not in the NE (r=-0.144, P=0.6) or in the CSME (r=-0.46, P=0.11) groups.Macular edema may be better documented by adding macular sensitivity mapping by microperimetry to macular thickness measurement by OCT and visual acuity determination because macular sensitivity seems to be a relevant explanatory variable of visual function, independent of macular thickness data. Moreover, microperimetry may be of value in predicting the outcome of diabetic macular edema, because it incorporates a functional measure that may supplement the predictive value of OCT and visual acuity.Optical coherence tomographic reflectivity of photoreceptors beneath cystoid spaces in diabetic macular edema.To investigate the relationship between the cystoid spaces in the outer plexiform layer (OPL) and the characteristics of the photoreceptors beneath the cystoid spaces in patients with diabetic macular edema (DME).In this observational cross-sectional study, 123 eyes of 96 consecutive patients with clinically significant macular edema were retrospectively reviewed. The characteristics of the photoreceptors on optical coherence tomography (OCT) images represented by the external limiting membrane (ELM) and the junction between inner and outer segments (IS/OS), and their association with the overlying cystoid spaces were investigated.The areas beneath the cystoid spaces in the OPL had a longer transverse length of disrupted or faint IS/OS and disrupted ELM lines than those without cystoid spaces (P < 0.001, P < 0.001, and P = 0.009). The IS/OS lines beneath the cystoid spaces had higher reflectivity than those in areas without cystoid spaces (P < 0.001). Enlarged cystoid spaces extending from the inner nuclear layer to the OPL were associated with disrupted IS/OS or ELM but not faint IS/OS (P < 0.001, P < 0.001, and P = 0.467). The transverse length of disrupted IS/OS at the fovea was correlated with the logarithm of the minimum angle of resolution (logMAR) more than the association between foveal thickness and logMAR (r = 0.49, P < 0.001 vs. r = 0.28, P = 0.002). The ELM descended to the RPE more frequently in eyes with single-lobulated fluorescein pooling in the foveal avascular zone than those with multi-lobulated pooling (P < 0.001).OCT showed that the cystoid spaces in the OPL were accompanied by photoreceptor damage beneath the cystoid spaces in DME.Macular thickness measured by optical coherence tomography (OCT) in diabetic patients.1) To compare macular thickness (MT) by optical coherence tomography (OCT) in diabetics and controls; 2) to assess the relationship between MT and stage of diabetic retinopathy (DR) and macular edema (ME); 3) to quantify MT changes after laser treatment for ME.One-hundred and thirty-seven patients with diabetes mellitus (216 eyes) were admitted to the study and examined by stereo-color fundus photos, retinal fluorangiography and OCT. DR was classified as: 1) no DR (46 eyes: 21.3%); 2) background DR (66 eyes: 30.6%); 3) pre-proliferative DR (50 eyes: 23.1%); 4) proliferative DR (54 eyes: 25%). The study group was then divided into three ME groups: 1) no edema (65 eyes: 30.1%); 2) not clinically significant ME (no CSME) (45 eyes: 20.8%); 3) clinically significant macular edema (CSME) (106 eyes: 49.1%). Three-month follow-up tomograms were taken to evaluate eyes laser-treated only for ME. The control group consisted of 50 eyes of 50 non-diabetic, age- and sex-matched subjects.MT was 369.3 +/- 163.2 microm in diabetics and 161.9 +/- 12.9 microm in controls (p < 0.001). In the four DR groups it was: 1) 211.0 +/- 37.6 microm; 2) 370.8 +/- 159.6 microm; 3) 419.1 +/- 138.2 microm; 4) 456.1 +/- 162.0 microm (p<0.001). In the three ME groups, MT was: 1)227.8 +/- 53.4 microm; 2) 321.8 +/- 124.2 microm; 3) 476.2 +/-146.6 microm (p < 0.001). In the 52 eyes treated with laser photocoagulation of the posterior pole only and with a follow-up > 3 months, MT before and after treatment was 468.2 +/- 83. 17 microm and 372.1 +/- 120.63 microm.MT was greater in diabetics than controls and tended to increase with DR and ME severity. OCT is a sensitive technique for detecting early diabetic macular abnormalities and quantifying their reduction after laser treatment.Association between hyperreflective foci in the outer retina, status of photoreceptor layer, and visual acuity in diabetic macular edema.To determine if hyperreflective foci in the outer retina are associated with photoreceptor integrity and the logarithm of minimal angle of resolution (logMAR) visual acuity (VA) in patients with diabetic macular edema (DME).Retrospective, observational, cross-sectional study.Patients (n=76; 108 eyes) with clinically relevant macular edema and no serous retinal detachment were analyzed retrospectively. Spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) images were obtained for all patients. We investigated the relationship between the hyperreflective foci in the outer retinal layers of the external limiting membrane (ELM) at the fovea and the photoreceptor integrity and VA.SD-OCT showed that 58 eyes (53.7%) had hyperreflective foci in the outer retinal layers, and 107 eyes (99.1%) had hyperreflective foci in the inner retinal layers. The logMAR VA was significantly (P<.0001) worse in eyes with hyperreflective foci in the outer retinal layers than in eyes without them (0.463±0.382 vs 0.127±0.206, respectively). Disruption of the ELM line on OCT was significantly (P<.0001, for both comparisons) associated with both hyperreflective foci in the outer retinal layers and poor logMAR VA. Disruption of the junction of the inner and outer segment line (IS/OS) also was related to hyperreflective foci in the outer retinal layers and poor logMAR VA (P<.0001 for both comparisons).The presence of hyperreflective foci in the outer retina is closely associated with a disrupted ELM and IS/OS line on SD-OCT images and decreased VA in DME.Patterns of diabetic macular edema with optical coherence tomography.We report cross-sectional images of diabetic macular edema and correlation between tomographic features and visual acuity with best correction by means of optical coherence tomography.In a prospective study, optical coherence tomography was performed in 59 eyes of 42 patients with diabetic macular edema and in 10 eyes of 10 normal control subjects.Optical coherence tomography showed three patterns of structural changes in diabetic macular edema: sponge-like retinal swelling (52 [88%] of 59 eyes), cystoid macular edema (28 [47%] of 59 eyes), and serous retinal detachment (9 [15%] of 59 eyes). Some eyes had more than one pathologic change. Retinal swelling was more pronounced in the outer rather than the inner retinal layers. Cystoid macular edema was located mainly in the outer retinal layers. In eyes with long-standing cystoid macular edema, cystoid spaces had fused, resulting in a large cystoid cavity involving almost the entire retinal layer. Hard exudates were seen as highly reflective areas located in the outer retinal layers. The retinal thickness at the central fovea and the visual acuity with best correction showed an intermediate negative correlation in eyes without cystoid macular edema (correlation coefficient: -0.61, P < .01).Diabetic macular edema involved three structural changes, including sponge-like retinal swelling (88%), cystoid macular edema (47%), and serous retinal detachment (15%). Visual acuity with best correction moderately correlated with retinal thickness regardless of the different tomographic features.A systematic correlation of angiography and high-resolution optical coherence tomography in diabetic macular edema.To correlate leakage patterns in fluorescein angiography (FA) images and retinal morphologic features in high-definition optical coherence tomography (HD OCT) images in diabetic macular edema.Prospective pilot study and case series.Nine consecutive patients (10 eyes) with diabetic macular edema.All patients were examined using FA (HRA 2; Heidelberg Engineering) and HD OCT (Carl Zeiss Meditec; resolution, 512x128 pixels, 5.8x5.8 mm, and high-resolution scans consisting of 4096 A scans) on the same day. Using Adobe Photoshop (CS2 Version 9.0; Adobe Systems Incorporated, San Jose, CA) a grid containing 15x7 fields was superimposed on the HD OCT en face image and a late-phase FA image according to retinal landmarks. In each patient, a standardized analysis of 105 subfields was performed to provide a characterization of the type of vascular leakage in FA and the associated retinal morphologic changes in corresponding locations.Angiographic leakage type and structural alteration in retinal morphologic features in OCT.There was a high consistency between FA and OCT in the petaloid pattern of hyperfluorescence that correlated with the presence of large cystic spaces in the outer nuclear layer (ONL) and the outer plexiform layer (OPL) with or without subretinal fluid in 30.4% and 69.6% of graded fields, respectively. A honeycomblike pattern of hyperfluorescence was associated with swelling and cystic spaces in ONL, OPL, the inner nuclear, and the inner plexiform layer in 71.4% of graded fields. Diffuse patterns of hyperfluorescence did not correlate with characteristic retinal changes in HD OCT, but rather showed diversity in the type of morphologic alteration. The presence of central fluid pooling, such as subretinal fluid, could be identified only by HD OCT and not by FA.In the examined patients, a petaloid pattern and a honeycomb pattern of hyperfluorescence observed in FA were found to correlate to characteristic changes in HD OCT, whereas a diffuse leakage pattern was associated with nonuniform changes in retinal morphologic features.The author(s) have no proprietary or commercial interest in any materials discussed in this article.Use of nonmydriatic spectral-domain optical coherence tomography for diagnosing diabetic macular edema.To evaluate the accuracy of 3 spectral-domain (SD) optical coherence tomography (OCT) devices (Topcon 3D-1000 [Topcon]; Cirrus HD [Carl Zeiss Meditec, Inc], and Spectralis OCT [Heidelberg Engineering]) before and after mydriasis for the diagnosis of diabetic macular edema.Cross-sectional study.Sixty-two eyes of 62 consecutive patients with diabetes without recent loss of vision referred for retinal control were assessed. Two scans were performed for each SD OCT instrument. Central retinal thickness was measured before and after pupil dilation. Pupil dynamic was studied using pMetrics pupillometer (iVIS Technologies), and lens opacity was measured by Pentacam densitometry (Oculus). The diagnostic accuracy of SD OCT devices was assessed by sensitivity, specificity, and area under the receiver operating characteristic curve. Logistic regression analysis was used to assess the effect of pupil size and lens opacity on the reliability of SD OCT in the acquisition of adequate images.The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve for the Topcon 3D OCT device was 0.84, that for the Cirrus HD OCT device was 0.93, and that for the Spectralis OCT device was 0.91. Significant differences in area under the receiver operating characteristic curve before and after pupillary dilatation were not found. Sensitivity and specificity associated with the cutoff value for the best performance were 82% and 74% for the Topcon 3D OCT device, 90% and 87% for the Cirrus HD OCT device, and 90% and 84% for the Spectralis OCT device, respectively. The Topcon 3D OCT device had an 11.3% segmentation algorithm failure rate for the central millimeter of the fovea, and the nuclear lens density was significantly greater in these eyes than in those without failure (17.1 ± 1.1 mm vs 10.4 ± 0.2 mm; P < .05).SD OCT is a useful tool to detect and to measure diabetic macular edema without the need for pupil dilatation.Topography of diabetic macular edema with optical coherence tomography.This study aimed to develop a protocol to screen and monitor patients with diabetic macular thickening using optical coherence tomography (OCT), a technique for high-resolution cross-sectional imaging of the retina.A cross-sectional pilot study was conducted.A total of 182 eyes of 107 patients with diabetic retinopathy, 55 eyes from 31 patients with diabetes but no ophthalmoscopic evidence of retinopathy, and 73 eyes from 41 healthy volunteers were studied.Six optical coherence tomograms were obtained in a radial spoke pattern centered on the fovea. Retinal thickness was computed automatically from each tomogram at a total of 600 locations throughout the macula. Macular thickness was displayed geographically as a false-color topographic map and was reported numerically as averages in each of nine regions.Correlation of OCT with slit-lamp biomicroscopy, fluorescein angiography, and visual acuity was measured.Optical coherence tomography was able to quantify the development and resolution of both foveal and extrafoveal macular thickening. The mean +/- standard deviation foveal thickness was 174 +/- 18 microns in normal eyes, 179 +/- 17 microns in diabetic eyes without retinopathy, and 256 +/- 114 microns in eyes with nonproliferative diabetic retinopathy. Foveal thickness was highly correlated among left and right eyes of normal eyes (mean +/- standard deviation difference of 6 +/- 9 microns). Foveal thickness measured by OCT correlated with visual acuity (r2 = 0.79). A single diabetic eye with no slit-lamp evidence of retinopathy showed abnormal foveal thickening on OCT.Optical coherence tomography was a useful technique for quantifying macular thickness in patients with diabetic macular edema. The topographic mapping protocol provided geographic information on macular thickness that was intuitive and objective.Optimal optical coherence tomography-based measures in the diagnosis of clinically significant macular edema: retinal volume vs foveal thickness.To compare optical coherence tomography-based measures of retinal thickness and volume as quantitative tests for clinically significant macular edema (CSME).Diagnostic validation study.Sixty-five eyes with diabetic retinopathy underwent stereo photographic and optical coherence tomographic examination. Stereo photographs were examined in a masked fashion to determine the presence or absence of CSME according to criteria from the Early Treatment Diabetic Retinopathy Study. Optical coherence tomography-based measurements of central foveal thickness as well as retinal volumes within a series of radii of fixation were generated. The main outcome measures were areas under receiver operating characteristic curves. Likelihood ratios, sensitivities, and specificities for the diagnosis of CSME were also evaluated.Retinal volumes within radii of 0.50 mm and 1.11 mm of fixation and central foveal thickness were the best variables for discriminating between those with and without CSME as evidenced by analysis of receiver operating characteristic curves. There were no significant differences among these 3 variables in their performance as diagnostic tests for CSME.Optical coherence tomography-based retinal volume and central foveal thickness variables display comparable abilities to discriminate between those with and without CSME. Both measures may have clinical applications as quantitative diagnostic tests for CSME.Comparison of time-domain OCT and fundus photographic assessments of retinal thickening in eyes with diabetic macular edema.To explore the correlation between optical coherence tomography (OCT) and stereoscopic fundus photographs (FP) for the assessment of retinal thickening (RT) in diabetic macular edema (DME) within a clinical trial.OCT, FP, and best corrected visual acuity (VA) measurements were obtained in both eyes of 263 participants in a trial comparing two photocoagulation techniques for DME. Correlation coefficients (r) were calculated comparing RT measured by OCT, RT estimated from FP, and VA. Principal variables were central subfield retinal thickness (CSRT) obtained from the OCT fast macular map and DME severity assessed by a reading center using a seven-step photographic scale combining the area of thickened retina within 1 disc diameter of the foveal center and thickening at the center.Medians (quartiles) for retinal thickness within the center subfield by OCT at baseline increased from 236 (214, 264) microm in the lowest level of the photographic scale to 517 (455, 598) microm in the highest level (r = 0.67). However, CSRT interquartile ranges were broad and overlapping between FP scale levels, and there were many outliers. Correlations between either modality and VA were weaker (r = 0.57 for CSRT, and r = 0.47 for the FP scale). OCT appeared to be more reproducible and more sensitive to change in RT between baseline and 1 year than was FP.There was a moderate correlation between OCT and FP assessments of RT in patients with DME and slightly less correlation of either measure with VA. OCT and FP provide complementary information but neither is a reliable surrogate for VA.The correlation between optical coherence tomographic features and severity of retinopathy, macular thickness and visual acuity in diabetic macular edema.To investigate the correlation between the features of optical coherence tomography (OCT) and the severity of concurrent retinopathy, central macular thickness (CMT), and best-corrected visual acuity in clinically significant diabetic macular edema.In a prospective study, OCT was performed in 55 eyes of 55 patients with clinically significant diabetic macular edema, in 58 eyes of 30 patients with diabetes without retinopathy, and in 40 eyes of 21 healthy control subjects. The OCT features were categorized into: type 1, sponge-like retinal swelling; type 2, cystoid macular edema; type 3, serous retinal detachment; and type 4, vitreofoveal traction.The CMT in eyes with diabetic macular edema was significantly higher than in eyes of healthy controls or in eyes of diabetic patients without retinopathy (P < 0.001). Visual acuity correlated with CMT in diabetic macular edema (r = 0.558, P < 0.001). The prevalence of OCT type 1 was significantly higher in eyes with mild-to-moderate non-proliferative retinopathy (NPDR) than in eyes with severe NPDR to proliferative retinopathy (PDR) (P = 0.0069). The prevalence of OCT types 3 and 4 was significantly higher in eyes with severe NPDR to PDR than in eyes with mild-to-moderate NPDR (P = 0.0056). OCT type 1 showed the least CMT (P < 0.001) and the best visual acuity (P = 0.002).There was a significant correlation between OCT patterns of clinically significant diabetic macular edema and severity of retinopathy, CMT, and visual acuity.The association between percent disruption of the photoreceptor inner segment-outer segment junction and visual acuity in diabetic macular edema.To evaluate the integrity of the photoreceptor inner segment/outer segment (IS/OS) junction using spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD OCT) in patients with diabetic macular edema and to correlate the relationship between the integrity of the IS/OS junction and visual acuity.Retrospective, comparative, consecutive case series.Sixty-two eyes from 38 patients with diabetic macular edema underwent SD OCT imaging. For each patient, 2 experienced observers masked to visual acuity measured several SD OCT variables, including central macular thickness, retinal volume, global disruption scale of outer retina, percentage disruption of the outer retina, and history of previous treatments. Visual acuity recorded as number of Early Treatment Diabetic Retinopathy Study letters was used as the outcome variable in univariate and multivariate analysis testing the measured SD OCT variables as predictors.A statistically significant correlation between percentage disruption of the IS/OS junction and visual acuity was found (P = .0312). Additionally, there was a strong trend suggesting a relationship between macular volume and visual acuity, although borderline significance was found (P = .07).Disruption of the photoreceptor IS/OS junction is an important predictor of visual acuity among diabetic macular edema patients.A systematic correlation between morphology and functional alterations in diabetic macular edema.The aim of this study was to correlate different types of retinal morphologic alterations secondary to diabetic macular disease with their characteristic impact on retinal function.In the present cross-sectional study, 26 eyes of 26 diabetic patients with clinically significant macular edema were examined. All patients underwent complete standardized ophthalmologic examination, including SD-OCT and microperimetry. Microperimetric values were projected over the scanning laser ophthalmoscope image of the OCT device, allowing direct correlation of functional and morphologic parameters. Results over all 1066 individual areas were analyzed using a general linear model.All the characteristic morphologic alterations demonstrated a significant effect on retinal function (P < 0.0002), except for outer nuclear layer (ONL) hyporeflectivity and small ONL cysts. Large ONL cysts (>220 μm) and serous retinal detachment had the greatest estimated negative effect on retinal sensitivity (-3.86 and -3.66 dB), followed by medium-sized ONL cysts, hard exudates associated with an extinction of the scan signal, and inner nuclear layer cysts.In diabetic macular edema, serous retinal detachment and large ONL cysts are the two morphologic changes with the greatest negative impact on retinal function.Quantitative assessment of retinal thickness in diabetic patients with and without clinically significant macular edema using optical coherence tomography.To assess patients with diabetic macular edema quantitatively using optical coherence tomography (OCT).OCT was performed in 14 eyes with diabetic retinopathy and ophthalmoscopic evidence of clinically significant macular edema (CSME) and in 19 diabetic eyes without CSME. Retinal thickness was computed from the tomograms at fovea and other 36 locations throughout the macula.The mean +/- standard deviation foveal thickness was 255.6 +/- 138.9 microm in eyes with CSME, and 174.6 +/- 38.2 microm in eyes without CSME (p = 0.051). Within 2000 microm of the center of the macula, eyes with CSME had significantly thicker retina in the inferior quadrant than those without CSME (p < 0.01). The foveal thickness was correlated with logMAR visual acuity (gamma = 0.68, p < 0.01). OCT identified sponge-like retinal swelling and/or cystoid macular edema in 11 (58%) eyes without CSME, and in 12 (86%) eyes with CSME.Criteria of CSME seem to be insufficient in really identifying macular edema. OCT may be more sensitive than a clinical examination in assessing diabetic macular edema and is a quantitative tool for documenting changes in macular thickening.Optical coherence tomographic assessment of diabetic macular edema: comparison with fluorescein angiographic and clinical findings.To compare the optical coherence tomographic (OCT) features with clinical and fluorescein angiographic (FA) findings in patients with diabetic retinopathy.In a retrospective study ophthalmologic examination together with FA and OCT images were obtained from 195 eyes of 110 patients with different stages of diabetic retinopathy and OCT images were obtained from 40 eyes of 20 control subjects. Fluorescein leakage characteristics were organized into five groups: no leakage (1), focal (2), diffuse (3), combined focal+diffuse leakage (4) and cystoid (5). The Pearson correlation test was used to test the correlation between visual acuity and central foveal thickness and ANOVA was used for the statistical comparison between the groups.The OCT images demonstrated retinal swelling in 66.1% of eyes, cystoid macular edema (CME) in 11.8% of eyes, serous foveal detachment + swelling in 6.2% of eyes, serous foveal detachment+swelling+CME in 3.6% of eyes and normal foveal structure in 12.3% of eyes. The best-corrected visual acuity was significantly correlated with central foveal thickness (r:-0.528, p<0.01). There was 77% agreement between clinical examination and OCT results. CME was detected with OCT in 15.4% of eyes in our study, 40% of which was not detected with slit-lamp biomicroscopy and 63.3% of which was not evident in FA. None of the serous foveal detachments could be detected during slit-lamp biomicroscopy or FA.OCT-3 provided objective documentation of foveal structural changes in eyes with diabetic retinopathy. Best-corrected visual acuity provided a significant correlation with the retinal thickness at the central fovea. These results indicate that OCT can facilitate deciding on the treatment protocol (surgical or medical) and follow-up of diabetic patients, which is especially important in the early stages of diabetic maculopathy when the structural changes are not yet evident with slit-lamp biomicroscopy or angiographically.Correlation between visual acuity and foveal microstructural changes in diabetic macular edema.The purpose of this study was to investigate the correlation between best-corrected visual acuity and foveal microstructural changes of the external limiting membrane and the junction between the inner and outer segments of the photoreceptors in diabetic macular edema.The authors performed spectral-domain optical coherence tomography in all eyes. The authors defined central subfield thickness as the average retinal thickness of the 1-mm central scanned area. The length of disruption of the external limiting membrane and the inner and outer segments of the photoreceptors in the fovea (1.8 mm in diameter) were measured and graded according to their length as follows: 1) >1.4 mm; 2) >0.4 mm but <1.4 mm; or 3) <0.4 mm.The best-corrected visual acuity was strongly associated with the external limiting membrane (r = 0.66) and inner and outer segments of the photoreceptor (r = 0.68) scores, whereas best-corrected visual acuity was weakly and negatively correlated with central subfield thickness (r = -0.23).Spectral-domain optical coherence tomography showed that the integrity of the external limiting membrane and inner and outer segments of the photoreceptors was more strongly correlated with best-corrected visual acuity when compared with central subfield thickness in diabetic macular edema.Segmentational analysis of retinal thickness after vitrectomy in diabetic macular edema.To measure the inner and outer retinal thicknesses on spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) and evaluate their association with logMAR after vitrectomy for diabetic macular edema (DME).In this retrospective case series, there were 55 consecutive eyes with DME for which vitrectomy was performed. The total retinal thickness, the inner thickness (from the innermost of the retina to the inner nuclear layer), and the outer thickness (from the outer plexiform layer to the retinal pigment epithelium) in the parafoveal subfields were measured manually, and the association with logMAR was evaluated.The total retinal thicknesses in the central, nasal, and inferior subfields were significantly (r = 0.37, P = 0.005; r = 0.29, P = 0.032; r = 0.33, P = 0.015, respectively) associated with the baseline logMAR; no subfield thickness was correlated with the logMAR at the final visit. However, segmentational analysis showed that the outer retinal thickness of the temporal subfield was associated with disruption of the junction between the inner and outer segments at the fovea (P = 0.021 and P = 0.005) and negatively correlated with the logMAR (r = -0.37, P = 0.006 and r = -0.28, P = 0.042) at the 6-month and final visit. The inner thickness of the nasal subfield did not change after vitrectomy compared with the other subfields and the outer thickness of all subfields in the parafoveal area; the baseline nasal total thickness was correlated most significantly with the logMAR (r = 0.40, P = 0.002 and r = 0.37, P = 0.006) at the 6-month and final visits.Segmentational analysis provided useful information for considering the prognosis and pathogenesis after vitrectomy for DME.Diabetic maculopathy induced by vitreo-macular traction: evaluation by optical coherence tomography (OCT).To evaluate the role and efficacy of optical coherence tomography (OCT) in the evaluation of diabetic maculopathy induced by vitreo-retinal traction.12 patients affected by diabetic maculopathy induced by vitreo-retinal traction were examined using biomicroscopy with a three-mirror contact lens, fluorescein angiography (FA) and OCT scanning in order to identify the presence of a vitreomacular traction.OCT revealed two patterns of maculopathy which were characterised by a thickening of the superior profile of the OCT tomogram or by the disappearance and inversion of the physiologic foveal depression respectively.OCT may be useful in the characterisation and monitoring of diabetic maculopathy induced by vitreo-retinal traction.Comparison of the clinical diagnosis of diabetic macular edema with diagnosis by optical coherence tomography.To compare the diagnosis of diabetic macular edema (DME) by stereoscopic slit-lamp biomicroscopic examination of the fundus with a 78-diopter noncontact lens with diagnosis by optical coherence tomography (OCT).Prospective, double-masked, noninterventional diagnostic study.Analysis of slit-lamp biomicroscopic findings compared with OCT measurements.Patients with DME from a private retina practice.Presence or absence of macular thickening.The reference range for this clinic was comparable to reference ranges published from other clinics. The clinical detection of DME was less than detection by OCT. Chance-corrected agreements (kappa statistic) of the 2 methods were 0.63 for the foveal zone and 0.36 to 0.42 for the 4 parafoveal zones. The errors committed in clinical examination were primarily of the type in which clinical examination did not detect DME but OCT did (58%-90%) for the 5 zones analyzed.Reference ranges for OCT seem to be similar for different clinical settings, suggesting the usefulness of OCT in multicenter studies. The current standard of care for DME detection, stereoscopic slit-lamp examination of the fundus, is less sensitive than OCT for detection of DME. Because the principal therapy for DME, focal laser photocoagulation, is mainly sight preserving and not sight restoring, the wider use of OCT may beneficially impact visual disability from DME.Retinal thickness in diabetic retinopathy: a study using optical coherence tomography (OCT).The authors conducted a controlled study to quantify macular retinal thickness in diabetic retinopathy using optical coherence tomography (OCT) as an objective and noninvasive tool. The relationship between retinal thickness and standard methods of evaluating macular edema was investigated.A total of 136 patients in different stages of diabetic retinopathy were examined with OCT. In addition, fluorescein angiograms as well as standard eye examinations were conducted. The control group consisted of 30 individuals with a normal macula.In the controls, retinal thickness was 153 +/- 15 microm in the fovea, 249 +/- 19 microm in the temporal parafoveal region, and 268 +/- 20 microm in the nasal parafoveal region. In diabetic patients, retinal thickness was increased to 307 +/- 136 microm in the fovea, 337 +/- 88 microm in the temporal retina, and 353 +/- 95 microm in the nasal retina, respectively. The differences between diabetics and controls were highly significant (P < 0.001). Retinal thickening correlated with fluorescein leakage in the angiograms to some extent. There was an intermediate correlation between retinal thickness and visual acuity, particularly in patients without macular ischemia. Sensitivity of detecting clinically significant macular edema by measuring foveal retinal thickness was 89% and specificity was 96%.Optical coherence tomography allows us to quantify retinal thickness in diabetic retinopathy with excellent reproducibility. OCT is able to detect sight-threatening macular edema with great reliability.Correlation between central subfield thickness, visual acuity and structural changes in diabetic macular edema.To correlate the central subfield thickness (CST) measured by Cirrus™ SD-OCT with best-corrected visual acuity (BCVA) and structural changes in diabetic macular edema (DME).The transversal study evaluated 200 patients with non-proliferative diabetic retinopathy (NPDR) and selected 55 eyes with DME between January, 2010 and April, 2011. Spectral domain OCT was performed in patients with type 2 diabetes and DME. CST and BCVA were correlated with the edema morphology and the ELM (external limiting membrane) integrity. Statistical tests were applied to validate the results.There was no difference between genders in the NPDR classification. 47.3% of the patients showed moderate NPDR. The CST average for male was of 393.58 µm and 434.16 µm for female, with no statistically significant difference. The patients with continuous ELM showed lower CST average (368.73 µm) than those with disrupted ELM (521.43 µm). There was a strong correlation between the macular volume and CST (59.63%), but poor correlation between age and CST (2.9%). Also, there was a significant difference between the average CST and the type of macular edema. Patients with serous detachment showed higher CST average (488.71 µm) than those with cystoid macular edema (CME) and diffuse edema. Patients with severe NPDR showed higher CST average (491.45 µm), if compared to mild and moderate NPDR. Cystoid macular edema was the most common type of edema (49.1%) and showed the worse VA. Patients with disrupted ELM showed worse BCVA. Patients with higher CST showed worse BCVA. There was a significant difference between the CST average of the case group (407.6 ± 113,1 µm) and the control group (diabetic patients without DME: 252 ± 12.5 µm). There was also a significant difference in the BCVA variables and macular volume between case and control groups.The study suggests that the CST of diabetic patients with edema is higher than the control group, the increase in CST of diabetic patients with edema leads to worsening of BCVA and macular volume. Continuous ELM showed lower CST average, and the serous detachment showed higher CST average. Cirrus™ proved to be an important tool in the DME evaluation.Automated detection of clinically significant macular edema by grid scanning optical coherence tomography.To compare the detection of clinically significant diabetic macular edema (DME) by an optical coherence tomography (OCT) grid scanning protocol and biomicroscopic examination.Retrospective case series.Outpatients at the Doheny Eye Institute.The clinical and imaging records of a consecutive series of 71 eyes of 40 patients referred for DME who underwent OCT using the both the Macular Grid 5 (MG5) scanning protocol (to allow a more evenly distributed sampling of points in the macula) and the standard Fast Macular Thickness Map (FMTM) pattern were reviewed. An automated algorithm was developed to generate a retinal thickness map using the MG5 data, which was then compared with a normative database to identify presumed areas of retinal edema. Clinically significant macular edema (CSME) was also identified by clinical examination and stereoscopic fundus photographs for comparison with the results of the OCT protocols.Sensitivity and specificity of scanning protocols.Optical coherence tomograms were inspected visually, and automatically detected retinal boundaries were found to be correct in 69 of 71 MG5 scans and in 65 of 71 FMTM scans. Macular Grid 5 scanning was performed twice in each eye, and the repeatability (pooled standard deviation) of the total area of edema was 0.48 mm2 (coefficient of variation, 6.8%). Sensitivity and specificity of the MG5 for detection of CSME relative to the clinical examination were 89% and 86%, respectively, with kappa being 0.74. Macular Grid 5 and FMTM assessment of foveal CSME also showed good agreement, with kappa being 0.68.The analysis algorithm for the OCT MG5 grid scan seems to be accurate and repeatable. Automated detection of CSME by the MG5 analysis correlated well with the clinical grading and standard OCT analysis (FMTM). Macular Grid 5 provides more information regarding the perifoveal macula than FMTM and may be of value to clinicians in planning treatment and in future studies of macular edema.Central retinal thickness measured with HD-OCT shows a weak correlation with visual acuity in eyes with CSME.To investigate the correlation between increased retinal thickness (RT) measured with spectral domain high-definition optical coherence tomography (OCT) (Cirrus HD-OCT (Carl Zeiss Meditec, Dublin, California, USA)) and best-corrected visual acuity (BCVA) in eyes with clinically significant macular oedema (CSME) and type 2 diabetes.Seventy eyes with CSME were included in this observational study. Sixty-two eyes were considered for analysis and were classified as having/not having retinal thickening in the central fovea (central 500-microm-diameter circle) by Cirrus HD-OCT. RT measurements were computed and correlated with BCVA. For comparison purposes, the Stratus OCT (Carl Zeiss Meditec, Dublin, California, USA) central point thickness was also obtained in these eyes.In the 19 eyes with CMSE identified by Cirrus HD-OCT without increased RT in the central fovea (500-microm-diameter circle), no correlation was found between RT and BCVA (R=0.062; 95% CI -0.404 to 0.502). In the 43 eyes where the Cirrus HD-OCT identified an increased RT in the central fovea (central 500-microm-diameter circle), only a moderate correlation between RT and BCVA was found (R=-0.459; 95% CI -0.667 to -0.184).Correlations between RT and BCVA in CSME are only present when the central 500-microm-diameter circle is involved. However, even in this circumstance, a correlation was found in only 48.8% of the cases. RT cannot, therefore, be used as a surrogate outcome for visual acuity changes.Detection of diabetic foveal edema: contact lens biomicroscopy compared with optical coherence tomography.To compare contact lens biomicroscopy with optical coherence tomography (OCT) for the detection of diabetic foveal edema.Study participants consisted of a convenient cohort of consecutive patients with diabetes mellitus seen at the Wilmer Eye Institute's Retinal Vascular Center, Baltimore, MD. Case characteristics were recorded and eyes were examined by 1 of 4 retina specialists by means of contact lens biomicroscopy. Edema involving the center of the macula was assessed as definitely present, questionably present, or definitely not present. The OCT testing was performed and interpreted by trained technicians, masked to the physicians' assessment of foveal edema. Agreement between OCT and contact lens examination for the absence or presence of foveal edema was evaluated.One hundred seventy-two eyes of 95 patients with diabetes were enrolled in August and September 2002. Foveal thickness was objectively measured by OCT in 170 (99%) of 172 cases. We found excellent agreement between OCT and contact lens examination for the absence or presence of foveal edema when OCT thickness was normal (<or=200 microm) or moderately to severely increased (>300 microm). However, agreement was poor when foveal thickness was mildly increased on OCT (201-300 microm).Agreement between contact lens examination and OCT for the detection of diabetic foveal edema is poor when OCT thickening is mild. This suggests that contact lens biomicroscopy is relatively insensitive for the detection of mild foveal thickening apparent on OCT. Additional studies are needed to investigate the natural course of cases with mildly increased foveal thickness on OCT that do not appear thickened clinically.Diabetic macular edema: correlation between microperimetry and optical coherence tomography findings.To compare the changes in macular sensitivity (microperimetry) and macular thickness with different degrees of diabetic macular edema.Sixty-one eyes of 32 consecutive diabetic patients were included in this cross-sectional study. All included eyes underwent functional and morphologic examination of the macular area. Best corrected visual acuity (ETDRS charts), macular sensitivity, and macular thickness were quantified. Lesion-related macular sensitivity and retinal fixation were investigated with an advanced, automatic microperimeter. Optical coherence tomography (OCT) was used to quantify macular thickness.The 61 included eyes were graded, by two retinal specialists, for diabetic macular edema as follows: 16 were graded as no macular edema (NE), 30 as non-clinically significant macular edema (NCSME), and 15 as clinically significant macular edema (CSME). Macular thickness significantly increased from the NE to the CSME group (P<0.0001), whereas macular sensitivity significantly decreased from the NE to the CSME group (P<0.0021). A significant correlation coefficient was noted between retinal sensitivity and normalized macular thickness (r=-0.37, P<0.0001). Linear regression analysis showed a decrease of 0.83 dB (P<0.0001) for every 10% of deviation of retinal thickness from normal values. Visual acuity and central macular sensitivity correlated significantly in the NCSME group (r=-0.6, P=0.0008), but not in the NE (r=-0.144, P=0.6) or in the CSME (r=-0.46, P=0.11) groups.Macular edema may be better documented by adding macular sensitivity mapping by microperimetry to macular thickness measurement by OCT and visual acuity determination because macular sensitivity seems to be a relevant explanatory variable of visual function, independent of macular thickness data. Moreover, microperimetry may be of value in predicting the outcome of diabetic macular edema, because it incorporates a functional measure that may supplement the predictive value of OCT and visual acuity.Diabetic macular edema assessed with optical coherence tomography and stereo fundus photography.To compare retinal thickening in diabetic macular edema assessed subjectively by evaluation of stereo fundus photographs with that assessed objectively by optical coherence tomography (OCT).Forty-degree stereo fundus photographs of the macular field and OCT scans in 84 eyes of 47 patients with diabetes were compared in terms of both location and area of retinal thickening. Six radiating 6-mm OCT scans at intervals of 30 degrees were obtained, and the retinal thickness was compared with the mean retinal thickness +/- 2 SD of healthy control subjects (33 eyes). Subsequently, retinal thickness was mapped topographically and the subjectively assessed retinal thickening map was overlaid. The degree of agreement on location was evaluated as retinal thickening present or absent in nine subfields of the fundus. Area of retinal thickening was divided into four categories: no retinal thickening, less than 1 disc area (DA), less than 2 DAs, or less than 3 DAs, expressed as the kappa statistic.Exact agreement on location was found in 676 of 756 (84 x 9) observations (89.4%; kappa = 0.69; 95% confidence interval [CI]: 0.63-0.75). Two eyes in which both methods assessed the same amount of retinal thickening showed no agreement on location. These eyes were compared only in terms of location. Exact agreement on area was found in 69 (84.1%) of 82 eyes. Weighted kappa (kappa(w)) = 0.79; 95% CI: 0.76-0.82).The degree of agreement between subjectively and objectively assessed retinal thickening was very good, implying that changes in diabetic macular edema can be accurately and prospectively measured with OCT.Optical coherence tomographic reflectivity of photoreceptors beneath cystoid spaces in diabetic macular edema.To investigate the relationship between the cystoid spaces in the outer plexiform layer (OPL) and the characteristics of the photoreceptors beneath the cystoid spaces in patients with diabetic macular edema (DME).In this observational cross-sectional study, 123 eyes of 96 consecutive patients with clinically significant macular edema were retrospectively reviewed. The characteristics of the photoreceptors on optical coherence tomography (OCT) images represented by the external limiting membrane (ELM) and the junction between inner and outer segments (IS/OS), and their association with the overlying cystoid spaces were investigated.The areas beneath the cystoid spaces in the OPL had a longer transverse length of disrupted or faint IS/OS and disrupted ELM lines than those without cystoid spaces (P < 0.001, P < 0.001, and P = 0.009). The IS/OS lines beneath the cystoid spaces had higher reflectivity than those in areas without cystoid spaces (P < 0.001). Enlarged cystoid spaces extending from the inner nuclear layer to the OPL were associated with disrupted IS/OS or ELM but not faint IS/OS (P < 0.001, P < 0.001, and P = 0.467). The transverse length of disrupted IS/OS at the fovea was correlated with the logarithm of the minimum angle of resolution (logMAR) more than the association between foveal thickness and logMAR (r = 0.49, P < 0.001 vs. r = 0.28, P = 0.002). The ELM descended to the RPE more frequently in eyes with single-lobulated fluorescein pooling in the foveal avascular zone than those with multi-lobulated pooling (P < 0.001).OCT showed that the cystoid spaces in the OPL were accompanied by photoreceptor damage beneath the cystoid spaces in DME.Macular thickness measured by optical coherence tomography (OCT) in diabetic patients.1) To compare macular thickness (MT) by optical coherence tomography (OCT) in diabetics and controls; 2) to assess the relationship between MT and stage of diabetic retinopathy (DR) and macular edema (ME); 3) to quantify MT changes after laser treatment for ME.One-hundred and thirty-seven patients with diabetes mellitus (216 eyes) were admitted to the study and examined by stereo-color fundus photos, retinal fluorangiography and OCT. DR was classified as: 1) no DR (46 eyes: 21.3%); 2) background DR (66 eyes: 30.6%); 3) pre-proliferative DR (50 eyes: 23.1%); 4) proliferative DR (54 eyes: 25%). The study group was then divided into three ME groups: 1) no edema (65 eyes: 30.1%); 2) not clinically significant ME (no CSME) (45 eyes: 20.8%); 3) clinically significant macular edema (CSME) (106 eyes: 49.1%). Three-month follow-up tomograms were taken to evaluate eyes laser-treated only for ME. The control group consisted of 50 eyes of 50 non-diabetic, age- and sex-matched subjects.MT was 369.3 +/- 163.2 microm in diabetics and 161.9 +/- 12.9 microm in controls (p < 0.001). In the four DR groups it was: 1) 211.0 +/- 37.6 microm; 2) 370.8 +/- 159.6 microm; 3) 419.1 +/- 138.2 microm; 4) 456.1 +/- 162.0 microm (p<0.001). In the three ME groups, MT was: 1)227.8 +/- 53.4 microm; 2) 321.8 +/- 124.2 microm; 3) 476.2 +/-146.6 microm (p < 0.001). In the 52 eyes treated with laser photocoagulation of the posterior pole only and with a follow-up > 3 months, MT before and after treatment was 468.2 +/- 83. 17 microm and 372.1 +/- 120.63 microm.MT was greater in diabetics than controls and tended to increase with DR and ME severity. OCT is a sensitive technique for detecting early diabetic macular abnormalities and quantifying their reduction after laser treatment.Association between hyperreflective foci in the outer retina, status of photoreceptor layer, and visual acuity in diabetic macular edema.To determine if hyperreflective foci in the outer retina are associated with photoreceptor integrity and the logarithm of minimal angle of resolution (logMAR) visual acuity (VA) in patients with diabetic macular edema (DME).Retrospective, observational, cross-sectional study.Patients (n=76; 108 eyes) with clinically relevant macular edema and no serous retinal detachment were analyzed retrospectively. Spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) images were obtained for all patients. We investigated the relationship between the hyperreflective foci in the outer retinal layers of the external limiting membrane (ELM) at the fovea and the photoreceptor integrity and VA.SD-OCT showed that 58 eyes (53.7%) had hyperreflective foci in the outer retinal layers, and 107 eyes (99.1%) had hyperreflective foci in the inner retinal layers. The logMAR VA was significantly (P<.0001) worse in eyes with hyperreflective foci in the outer retinal layers than in eyes without them (0.463±0.382 vs 0.127±0.206, respectively). Disruption of the ELM line on OCT was significantly (P<.0001, for both comparisons) associated with both hyperreflective foci in the outer retinal layers and poor logMAR VA. Disruption of the junction of the inner and outer segment line (IS/OS) also was related to hyperreflective foci in the outer retinal layers and poor logMAR VA (P<.0001 for both comparisons).The presence of hyperreflective foci in the outer retina is closely associated with a disrupted ELM and IS/OS line on SD-OCT images and decreased VA in DME.Patterns of diabetic macular edema with optical coherence tomography.We report cross-sectional images of diabetic macular edema and correlation between tomographic features and visual acuity with best correction by means of optical coherence tomography.In a prospective study, optical coherence tomography was performed in 59 eyes of 42 patients with diabetic macular edema and in 10 eyes of 10 normal control subjects.Optical coherence tomography showed three patterns of structural changes in diabetic macular edema: sponge-like retinal swelling (52 [88%] of 59 eyes), cystoid macular edema (28 [47%] of 59 eyes), and serous retinal detachment (9 [15%] of 59 eyes). Some eyes had more than one pathologic change. Retinal swelling was more pronounced in the outer rather than the inner retinal layers. Cystoid macular edema was located mainly in the outer retinal layers. In eyes with long-standing cystoid macular edema, cystoid spaces had fused, resulting in a large cystoid cavity involving almost the entire retinal layer. Hard exudates were seen as highly reflective areas located in the outer retinal layers. The retinal thickness at the central fovea and the visual acuity with best correction showed an intermediate negative correlation in eyes without cystoid macular edema (correlation coefficient: -0.61, P < .01).Diabetic macular edema involved three structural changes, including sponge-like retinal swelling (88%), cystoid macular edema (47%), and serous retinal detachment (15%). Visual acuity with best correction moderately correlated with retinal thickness regardless of the different tomographic features.Retinal thickness in diabetic retinopathy: comparison of optical coherence tomography, the retinal thickness analyzer, and fundus photography.Optical coherence tomography (OCT) and the retinal thickness analyzer (RTA) have proved their ability to measure retinal thickness in healthy subjects and diabetics reliably. In the present study, both techniques were compared for the same study population of diabetic patients, and the findings were related to macular edema shown by stereo fundus photography (SFP).Maculas of 124 eyes from 69 patients with diabetes mellitus were examined with OCT and the RTA. Measurements of retinal thickness were compared with signs of macular edema shown by SFP. For each eye, nine different sectors were analyzed (a foveal sector, four parafoveal sectors, and four extrafoveal sectors). Thirteen eyes with a normal macula served as controls. Sensitivity and specificity of detecting clinically significant macular edema (CSME) were calculated.Of 111 eyes, 64 showed signs of CSME by SFP. Mean retinal thickness +/- SD of the foveal sector was 249 +/- 104 microm by RTA and 295 +/- 124 microm by OCT measurements. There was a moderate overall correlation between OCT and the RTA (r = 0.66). The correlation was best in the foveal sector (r = 0.82). Overall correlation with SFP was better for OCT (r = 0.77) than for the RTA (r = 0.62). Sensitivity of detecting CSME was consistently higher with OCT, while the RTA showed higher specificity.Both measuring techniques yielded similar results when examining eyes of patients with diabetes, although absolute values differed. OCT seems to be more suitable in the clinical screening for macular edema due to its high sensitivity (>90%) with appropriate analysis parameters. The RTA is more prone to erroneous or missing thickness readings particularly under difficult measuring conditions.A systematic correlation of angiography and high-resolution optical coherence tomography in diabetic macular edema.To correlate leakage patterns in fluorescein angiography (FA) images and retinal morphologic features in high-definition optical coherence tomography (HD OCT) images in diabetic macular edema.Prospective pilot study and case series.Nine consecutive patients (10 eyes) with diabetic macular edema.All patients were examined using FA (HRA 2; Heidelberg Engineering) and HD OCT (Carl Zeiss Meditec; resolution, 512x128 pixels, 5.8x5.8 mm, and high-resolution scans consisting of 4096 A scans) on the same day. Using Adobe Photoshop (CS2 Version 9.0; Adobe Systems Incorporated, San Jose, CA) a grid containing 15x7 fields was superimposed on the HD OCT en face image and a late-phase FA image according to retinal landmarks. In each patient, a standardized analysis of 105 subfields was performed to provide a characterization of the type of vascular leakage in FA and the associated retinal morphologic changes in corresponding locations.Angiographic leakage type and structural alteration in retinal morphologic features in OCT.There was a high consistency between FA and OCT in the petaloid pattern of hyperfluorescence that correlated with the presence of large cystic spaces in the outer nuclear layer (ONL) and the outer plexiform layer (OPL) with or without subretinal fluid in 30.4% and 69.6% of graded fields, respectively. A honeycomblike pattern of hyperfluorescence was associated with swelling and cystic spaces in ONL, OPL, the inner nuclear, and the inner plexiform layer in 71.4% of graded fields. Diffuse patterns of hyperfluorescence did not correlate with characteristic retinal changes in HD OCT, but rather showed diversity in the type of morphologic alteration. The presence of central fluid pooling, such as subretinal fluid, could be identified only by HD OCT and not by FA.In the examined patients, a petaloid pattern and a honeycomb pattern of hyperfluorescence observed in FA were found to correlate to characteristic changes in HD OCT, whereas a diffuse leakage pattern was associated with nonuniform changes in retinal morphologic features.The author(s) have no proprietary or commercial interest in any materials discussed in this article.Use of nonmydriatic spectral-domain optical coherence tomography for diagnosing diabetic macular edema.To evaluate the accuracy of 3 spectral-domain (SD) optical coherence tomography (OCT) devices (Topcon 3D-1000 [Topcon]; Cirrus HD [Carl Zeiss Meditec, Inc], and Spectralis OCT [Heidelberg Engineering]) before and after mydriasis for the diagnosis of diabetic macular edema.Cross-sectional study.Sixty-two eyes of 62 consecutive patients with diabetes without recent loss of vision referred for retinal control were assessed. Two scans were performed for each SD OCT instrument. Central retinal thickness was measured before and after pupil dilation. Pupil dynamic was studied using pMetrics pupillometer (iVIS Technologies), and lens opacity was measured by Pentacam densitometry (Oculus). The diagnostic accuracy of SD OCT devices was assessed by sensitivity, specificity, and area under the receiver operating characteristic curve. Logistic regression analysis was used to assess the effect of pupil size and lens opacity on the reliability of SD OCT in the acquisition of adequate images.The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve for the Topcon 3D OCT device was 0.84, that for the Cirrus HD OCT device was 0.93, and that for the Spectralis OCT device was 0.91. Significant differences in area under the receiver operating characteristic curve before and after pupillary dilatation were not found. Sensitivity and specificity associated with the cutoff value for the best performance were 82% and 74% for the Topcon 3D OCT device, 90% and 87% for the Cirrus HD OCT device, and 90% and 84% for the Spectralis OCT device, respectively. The Topcon 3D OCT device had an 11.3% segmentation algorithm failure rate for the central millimeter of the fovea, and the nuclear lens density was significantly greater in these eyes than in those without failure (17.1 ± 1.1 mm vs 10.4 ± 0.2 mm; P < .05).SD OCT is a useful tool to detect and to measure diabetic macular edema without the need for pupil dilatation.Topography of diabetic macular edema with optical coherence tomography.This study aimed to develop a protocol to screen and monitor patients with diabetic macular thickening using optical coherence tomography (OCT), a technique for high-resolution cross-sectional imaging of the retina.A cross-sectional pilot study was conducted.A total of 182 eyes of 107 patients with diabetic retinopathy, 55 eyes from 31 patients with diabetes but no ophthalmoscopic evidence of retinopathy, and 73 eyes from 41 healthy volunteers were studied.Six optical coherence tomograms were obtained in a radial spoke pattern centered on the fovea. Retinal thickness was computed automatically from each tomogram at a total of 600 locations throughout the macula. Macular thickness was displayed geographically as a false-color topographic map and was reported numerically as averages in each of nine regions.Correlation of OCT with slit-lamp biomicroscopy, fluorescein angiography, and visual acuity was measured.Optical coherence tomography was able to quantify the development and resolution of both foveal and extrafoveal macular thickening. The mean +/- standard deviation foveal thickness was 174 +/- 18 microns in normal eyes, 179 +/- 17 microns in diabetic eyes without retinopathy, and 256 +/- 114 microns in eyes with nonproliferative diabetic retinopathy. Foveal thickness was highly correlated among left and right eyes of normal eyes (mean +/- standard deviation difference of 6 +/- 9 microns). Foveal thickness measured by OCT correlated with visual acuity (r2 = 0.79). A single diabetic eye with no slit-lamp evidence of retinopathy showed abnormal foveal thickening on OCT.Optical coherence tomography was a useful technique for quantifying macular thickness in patients with diabetic macular edema. The topographic mapping protocol provided geographic information on macular thickness that was intuitive and objective.Optimal optical coherence tomography-based measures in the diagnosis of clinically significant macular edema: retinal volume vs foveal thickness.To compare optical coherence tomography-based measures of retinal thickness and volume as quantitative tests for clinically significant macular edema (CSME).Diagnostic validation study.Sixty-five eyes with diabetic retinopathy underwent stereo photographic and optical coherence tomographic examination. Stereo photographs were examined in a masked fashion to determine the presence or absence of CSME according to criteria from the Early Treatment Diabetic Retinopathy Study. Optical coherence tomography-based measurements of central foveal thickness as well as retinal volumes within a series of radii of fixation were generated. The main outcome measures were areas under receiver operating characteristic curves. Likelihood ratios, sensitivities, and specificities for the diagnosis of CSME were also evaluated.Retinal volumes within radii of 0.50 mm and 1.11 mm of fixation and central foveal thickness were the best variables for discriminating between those with and without CSME as evidenced by analysis of receiver operating characteristic curves. There were no significant differences among these 3 variables in their performance as diagnostic tests for CSME.Optical coherence tomography-based retinal volume and central foveal thickness variables display comparable abilities to discriminate between those with and without CSME. Both measures may have clinical applications as quantitative diagnostic tests for CSME.Comparison of time-domain OCT and fundus photographic assessments of retinal thickening in eyes with diabetic macular edema.To explore the correlation between optical coherence tomography (OCT) and stereoscopic fundus photographs (FP) for the assessment of retinal thickening (RT) in diabetic macular edema (DME) within a clinical trial.OCT, FP, and best corrected visual acuity (VA) measurements were obtained in both eyes of 263 participants in a trial comparing two photocoagulation techniques for DME. Correlation coefficients (r) were calculated comparing RT measured by OCT, RT estimated from FP, and VA. Principal variables were central subfield retinal thickness (CSRT) obtained from the OCT fast macular map and DME severity assessed by a reading center using a seven-step photographic scale combining the area of thickened retina within 1 disc diameter of the foveal center and thickening at the center.Medians (quartiles) for retinal thickness within the center subfield by OCT at baseline increased from 236 (214, 264) microm in the lowest level of the photographic scale to 517 (455, 598) microm in the highest level (r = 0.67). However, CSRT interquartile ranges were broad and overlapping between FP scale levels, and there were many outliers. Correlations between either modality and VA were weaker (r = 0.57 for CSRT, and r = 0.47 for the FP scale). OCT appeared to be more reproducible and more sensitive to change in RT between baseline and 1 year than was FP.There was a moderate correlation between OCT and FP assessments of RT in patients with DME and slightly less correlation of either measure with VA. OCT and FP provide complementary information but neither is a reliable surrogate for VA.The correlation between optical coherence tomographic features and severity of retinopathy, macular thickness and visual acuity in diabetic macular edema.To investigate the correlation between the features of optical coherence tomography (OCT) and the severity of concurrent retinopathy, central macular thickness (CMT), and best-corrected visual acuity in clinically significant diabetic macular edema.In a prospective study, OCT was performed in 55 eyes of 55 patients with clinically significant diabetic macular edema, in 58 eyes of 30 patients with diabetes without retinopathy, and in 40 eyes of 21 healthy control subjects. The OCT features were categorized into: type 1, sponge-like retinal swelling; type 2, cystoid macular edema; type 3, serous retinal detachment; and type 4, vitreofoveal traction.The CMT in eyes with diabetic macular edema was significantly higher than in eyes of healthy controls or in eyes of diabetic patients without retinopathy (P < 0.001). Visual acuity correlated with CMT in diabetic macular edema (r = 0.558, P < 0.001). The prevalence of OCT type 1 was significantly higher in eyes with mild-to-moderate non-proliferative retinopathy (NPDR) than in eyes with severe NPDR to proliferative retinopathy (PDR) (P = 0.0069). The prevalence of OCT types 3 and 4 was significantly higher in eyes with severe NPDR to PDR than in eyes with mild-to-moderate NPDR (P = 0.0056). OCT type 1 showed the least CMT (P < 0.001) and the best visual acuity (P = 0.002).There was a significant correlation between OCT patterns of clinically significant diabetic macular edema and severity of retinopathy, CMT, and visual acuity.The association between percent disruption of the photoreceptor inner segment-outer segment junction and visual acuity in diabetic macular edema.To evaluate the integrity of the photoreceptor inner segment/outer segment (IS/OS) junction using spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD OCT) in patients with diabetic macular edema and to correlate the relationship between the integrity of the IS/OS junction and visual acuity.Retrospective, comparative, consecutive case series.Sixty-two eyes from 38 patients with diabetic macular edema underwent SD OCT imaging. For each patient, 2 experienced observers masked to visual acuity measured several SD OCT variables, including central macular thickness, retinal volume, global disruption scale of outer retina, percentage disruption of the outer retina, and history of previous treatments. Visual acuity recorded as number of Early Treatment Diabetic Retinopathy Study letters was used as the outcome variable in univariate and multivariate analysis testing the measured SD OCT variables as predictors.A statistically significant correlation between percentage disruption of the IS/OS junction and visual acuity was found (P = .0312). Additionally, there was a strong trend suggesting a relationship between macular volume and visual acuity, although borderline significance was found (P = .07).Disruption of the photoreceptor IS/OS junction is an important predictor of visual acuity among diabetic macular edema patients.A systematic correlation between morphology and functional alterations in diabetic macular edema.The aim of this study was to correlate different types of retinal morphologic alterations secondary to diabetic macular disease with their characteristic impact on retinal function.In the present cross-sectional study, 26 eyes of 26 diabetic patients with clinically significant macular edema were examined. All patients underwent complete standardized ophthalmologic examination, including SD-OCT and microperimetry. Microperimetric values were projected over the scanning laser ophthalmoscope image of the OCT device, allowing direct correlation of functional and morphologic parameters. Results over all 1066 individual areas were analyzed using a general linear model.All the characteristic morphologic alterations demonstrated a significant effect on retinal function (P < 0.0002), except for outer nuclear layer (ONL) hyporeflectivity and small ONL cysts. Large ONL cysts (>220 μm) and serous retinal detachment had the greatest estimated negative effect on retinal sensitivity (-3.86 and -3.66 dB), followed by medium-sized ONL cysts, hard exudates associated with an extinction of the scan signal, and inner nuclear layer cysts.In diabetic macular edema, serous retinal detachment and large ONL cysts are the two morphologic changes with the greatest negative impact on retinal function.Quantitative assessment of retinal thickness in diabetic patients with and without clinically significant macular edema using optical coherence tomography.To assess patients with diabetic macular edema quantitatively using optical coherence tomography (OCT).OCT was performed in 14 eyes with diabetic retinopathy and ophthalmoscopic evidence of clinically significant macular edema (CSME) and in 19 diabetic eyes without CSME. Retinal thickness was computed from the tomograms at fovea and other 36 locations throughout the macula.The mean +/- standard deviation foveal thickness was 255.6 +/- 138.9 microm in eyes with CSME, and 174.6 +/- 38.2 microm in eyes without CSME (p = 0.051). Within 2000 microm of the center of the macula, eyes with CSME had significantly thicker retina in the inferior quadrant than those without CSME (p < 0.01). The foveal thickness was correlated with logMAR visual acuity (gamma = 0.68, p < 0.01). OCT identified sponge-like retinal swelling and/or cystoid macular edema in 11 (58%) eyes without CSME, and in 12 (86%) eyes with CSME.Criteria of CSME seem to be insufficient in really identifying macular edema. OCT may be more sensitive than a clinical examination in assessing diabetic macular edema and is a quantitative tool for documenting changes in macular thickening.Optical coherence tomographic assessment of diabetic macular edema: comparison with fluorescein angiographic and clinical findings.To compare the optical coherence tomographic (OCT) features with clinical and fluorescein angiographic (FA) findings in patients with diabetic retinopathy.In a retrospective study ophthalmologic examination together with FA and OCT images were obtained from 195 eyes of 110 patients with different stages of diabetic retinopathy and OCT images were obtained from 40 eyes of 20 control subjects. Fluorescein leakage characteristics were organized into five groups: no leakage (1), focal (2), diffuse (3), combined focal+diffuse leakage (4) and cystoid (5). The Pearson correlation test was used to test the correlation between visual acuity and central foveal thickness and ANOVA was used for the statistical comparison between the groups.The OCT images demonstrated retinal swelling in 66.1% of eyes, cystoid macular edema (CME) in 11.8% of eyes, serous foveal detachment + swelling in 6.2% of eyes, serous foveal detachment+swelling+CME in 3.6% of eyes and normal foveal structure in 12.3% of eyes. The best-corrected visual acuity was significantly correlated with central foveal thickness (r:-0.528, p<0.01). There was 77% agreement between clinical examination and OCT results. CME was detected with OCT in 15.4% of eyes in our study, 40% of which was not detected with slit-lamp biomicroscopy and 63.3% of which was not evident in FA. None of the serous foveal detachments could be detected during slit-lamp biomicroscopy or FA.OCT-3 provided objective documentation of foveal structural changes in eyes with diabetic retinopathy. Best-corrected visual acuity provided a significant correlation with the retinal thickness at the central fovea. These results indicate that OCT can facilitate deciding on the treatment protocol (surgical or medical) and follow-up of diabetic patients, which is especially important in the early stages of diabetic maculopathy when the structural changes are not yet evident with slit-lamp biomicroscopy or angiographically.Correlation between visual acuity and foveal microstructural changes in diabetic macular edema.The purpose of this study was to investigate the correlation between best-corrected visual acuity and foveal microstructural changes of the external limiting membrane and the junction between the inner and outer segments of the photoreceptors in diabetic macular edema.The authors performed spectral-domain optical coherence tomography in all eyes. The authors defined central subfield thickness as the average retinal thickness of the 1-mm central scanned area. The length of disruption of the external limiting membrane and the inner and outer segments of the photoreceptors in the fovea (1.8 mm in diameter) were measured and graded according to their length as follows: 1) >1.4 mm; 2) >0.4 mm but <1.4 mm; or 3) <0.4 mm.The best-corrected visual acuity was strongly associated with the external limiting membrane (r = 0.66) and inner and outer segments of the photoreceptor (r = 0.68) scores, whereas best-corrected visual acuity was weakly and negatively correlated with central subfield thickness (r = -0.23).Spectral-domain optical coherence tomography showed that the integrity of the external limiting membrane and inner and outer segments of the photoreceptors was more strongly correlated with best-corrected visual acuity when compared with central subfield thickness in diabetic macular edema.Segmentational analysis of retinal thickness after vitrectomy in diabetic macular edema.To measure the inner and outer retinal thicknesses on spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) and evaluate their association with logMAR after vitrectomy for diabetic macular edema (DME).In this retrospective case series, there were 55 consecutive eyes with DME for which vitrectomy was performed. The total retinal thickness, the inner thickness (from the innermost of the retina to the inner nuclear layer), and the outer thickness (from the outer plexiform layer to the retinal pigment epithelium) in the parafoveal subfields were measured manually, and the association with logMAR was evaluated.The total retinal thicknesses in the central, nasal, and inferior subfields were significantly (r = 0.37, P = 0.005; r = 0.29, P = 0.032; r = 0.33, P = 0.015, respectively) associated with the baseline logMAR; no subfield thickness was correlated with the logMAR at the final visit. However, segmentational analysis showed that the outer retinal thickness of the temporal subfield was associated with disruption of the junction between the inner and outer segments at the fovea (P = 0.021 and P = 0.005) and negatively correlated with the logMAR (r = -0.37, P = 0.006 and r = -0.28, P = 0.042) at the 6-month and final visit. The inner thickness of the nasal subfield did not change after vitrectomy compared with the other subfields and the outer thickness of all subfields in the parafoveal area; the baseline nasal total thickness was correlated most significantly with the logMAR (r = 0.40, P = 0.002 and r = 0.37, P = 0.006) at the 6-month and final visits.Segmentational analysis provided useful information for considering the prognosis and pathogenesis after vitrectomy for DME.Diabetic maculopathy induced by vitreo-macular traction: evaluation by optical coherence tomography (OCT).To evaluate the role and efficacy of optical coherence tomography (OCT) in the evaluation of diabetic maculopathy induced by vitreo-retinal traction.12 patients affected by diabetic maculopathy induced by vitreo-retinal traction were examined using biomicroscopy with a three-mirror contact lens, fluorescein angiography (FA) and OCT scanning in order to identify the presence of a vitreomacular traction.OCT revealed two patterns of maculopathy which were characterised by a thickening of the superior profile of the OCT tomogram or by the disappearance and inversion of the physiologic foveal depression respectively.OCT may be useful in the characterisation and monitoring of diabetic maculopathy induced by vitreo-retinal traction.Comparison of the clinical diagnosis of diabetic macular edema with diagnosis by optical coherence tomography.To compare the diagnosis of diabetic macular edema (DME) by stereoscopic slit-lamp biomicroscopic examination of the fundus with a 78-diopter noncontact lens with diagnosis by optical coherence tomography (OCT).Prospective, double-masked, noninterventional diagnostic study.Analysis of slit-lamp biomicroscopic findings compared with OCT measurements.Patients with DME from a private retina practice.Presence or absence of macular thickening.The reference range for this clinic was comparable to reference ranges published from other clinics. The clinical detection of DME was less than detection by OCT. Chance-corrected agreements (kappa statistic) of the 2 methods were 0.63 for the foveal zone and 0.36 to 0.42 for the 4 parafoveal zones. The errors committed in clinical examination were primarily of the type in which clinical examination did not detect DME but OCT did (58%-90%) for the 5 zones analyzed.Reference ranges for OCT seem to be similar for different clinical settings, suggesting the usefulness of OCT in multicenter studies. The current standard of care for DME detection, stereoscopic slit-lamp examination of the fundus, is less sensitive than OCT for detection of DME. Because the principal therapy for DME, focal laser photocoagulation, is mainly sight preserving and not sight restoring, the wider use of OCT may beneficially impact visual disability from DME.Retinal thickness in diabetic retinopathy: a study using optical coherence tomography (OCT).The authors conducted a controlled study to quantify macular retinal thickness in diabetic retinopathy using optical coherence tomography (OCT) as an objective and noninvasive tool. The relationship between retinal thickness and standard methods of evaluating macular edema was investigated.A total of 136 patients in different stages of diabetic retinopathy were examined with OCT. In addition, fluorescein angiograms as well as standard eye examinations were conducted. The control group consisted of 30 individuals with a normal macula.In the controls, retinal thickness was 153 +/- 15 microm in the fovea, 249 +/- 19 microm in the temporal parafoveal region, and 268 +/- 20 microm in the nasal parafoveal region. In diabetic patients, retinal thickness was increased to 307 +/- 136 microm in the fovea, 337 +/- 88 microm in the temporal retina, and 353 +/- 95 microm in the nasal retina, respectively. The differences between diabetics and controls were highly significant (P < 0.001). Retinal thickening correlated with fluorescein leakage in the angiograms to some extent. There was an intermediate correlation between retinal thickness and visual acuity, particularly in patients without macular ischemia. Sensitivity of detecting clinically significant macular edema by measuring foveal retinal thickness was 89% and specificity was 96%.Optical coherence tomography allows us to quantify retinal thickness in diabetic retinopathy with excellent reproducibility. OCT is able to detect sight-threatening macular edema with great reliability.Correlation between central subfield thickness, visual acuity and structural changes in diabetic macular edema.To correlate the central subfield thickness (CST) measured by Cirrus™ SD-OCT with best-corrected visual acuity (BCVA) and structural changes in diabetic macular edema (DME).The transversal study evaluated 200 patients with non-proliferative diabetic retinopathy (NPDR) and selected 55 eyes with DME between January, 2010 and April, 2011. Spectral domain OCT was performed in patients with type 2 diabetes and DME. CST and BCVA were correlated with the edema morphology and the ELM (external limiting membrane) integrity. Statistical tests were applied to validate the results.There was no difference between genders in the NPDR classification. 47.3% of the patients showed moderate NPDR. The CST average for male was of 393.58 µm and 434.16 µm for female, with no statistically significant difference. The patients with continuous ELM showed lower CST average (368.73 µm) than those with disrupted ELM (521.43 µm). There was a strong correlation between the macular volume and CST (59.63%), but poor correlation between age and CST (2.9%). Also, there was a significant difference between the average CST and the type of macular edema. Patients with serous detachment showed higher CST average (488.71 µm) than those with cystoid macular edema (CME) and diffuse edema. Patients with severe NPDR showed higher CST average (491.45 µm), if compared to mild and moderate NPDR. Cystoid macular edema was the most common type of edema (49.1%) and showed the worse VA. Patients with disrupted ELM showed worse BCVA. Patients with higher CST showed worse BCVA. There was a significant difference between the CST average of the case group (407.6 ± 113,1 µm) and the control group (diabetic patients without DME: 252 ± 12.5 µm). There was also a significant difference in the BCVA variables and macular volume between case and control groups.The study suggests that the CST of diabetic patients with edema is higher than the control group, the increase in CST of diabetic patients with edema leads to worsening of BCVA and macular volume. Continuous ELM showed lower CST average, and the serous detachment showed higher CST average. Cirrus™ proved to be an important tool in the DME evaluation.Automated detection of clinically significant macular edema by grid scanning optical coherence tomography.To compare the detection of clinically significant diabetic macular edema (DME) by an optical coherence tomography (OCT) grid scanning protocol and biomicroscopic examination.Retrospective case series.Outpatients at the Doheny Eye Institute.The clinical and imaging records of a consecutive series of 71 eyes of 40 patients referred for DME who underwent OCT using the both the Macular Grid 5 (MG5) scanning protocol (to allow a more evenly distributed sampling of points in the macula) and the standard Fast Macular Thickness Map (FMTM) pattern were reviewed. An automated algorithm was developed to generate a retinal thickness map using the MG5 data, which was then compared with a normative database to identify presumed areas of retinal edema. Clinically significant macular edema (CSME) was also identified by clinical examination and stereoscopic fundus photographs for comparison with the results of the OCT protocols.Sensitivity and specificity of scanning protocols.Optical coherence tomograms were inspected visually, and automatically detected retinal boundaries were found to be correct in 69 of 71 MG5 scans and in 65 of 71 FMTM scans. Macular Grid 5 scanning was performed twice in each eye, and the repeatability (pooled standard deviation) of the total area of edema was 0.48 mm2 (coefficient of variation, 6.8%). Sensitivity and specificity of the MG5 for detection of CSME relative to the clinical examination were 89% and 86%, respectively, with kappa being 0.74. Macular Grid 5 and FMTM assessment of foveal CSME also showed good agreement, with kappa being 0.68.The analysis algorithm for the OCT MG5 grid scan seems to be accurate and repeatable. Automated detection of CSME by the MG5 analysis correlated well with the clinical grading and standard OCT analysis (FMTM). Macular Grid 5 provides more information regarding the perifoveal macula than FMTM and may be of value to clinicians in planning treatment and in future studies of macular edema.Central retinal thickness measured with HD-OCT shows a weak correlation with visual acuity in eyes with CSME.To investigate the correlation between increased retinal thickness (RT) measured with spectral domain high-definition optical coherence tomography (OCT) (Cirrus HD-OCT (Carl Zeiss Meditec, Dublin, California, USA)) and best-corrected visual acuity (BCVA) in eyes with clinically significant macular oedema (CSME) and type 2 diabetes.Seventy eyes with CSME were included in this observational study. Sixty-two eyes were considered for analysis and were classified as having/not having retinal thickening in the central fovea (central 500-microm-diameter circle) by Cirrus HD-OCT. RT measurements were computed and correlated with BCVA. For comparison purposes, the Stratus OCT (Carl Zeiss Meditec, Dublin, California, USA) central point thickness was also obtained in these eyes.In the 19 eyes with CMSE identified by Cirrus HD-OCT without increased RT in the central fovea (500-microm-diameter circle), no correlation was found between RT and BCVA (R=0.062; 95% CI -0.404 to 0.502). In the 43 eyes where the Cirrus HD-OCT identified an increased RT in the central fovea (central 500-microm-diameter circle), only a moderate correlation between RT and BCVA was found (R=-0.459; 95% CI -0.667 to -0.184).Correlations between RT and BCVA in CSME are only present when the central 500-microm-diameter circle is involved. However, even in this circumstance, a correlation was found in only 48.8% of the cases. RT cannot, therefore, be used as a surrogate outcome for visual acuity changes.Detection of diabetic foveal edema: contact lens biomicroscopy compared with optical coherence tomography.To compare contact lens biomicroscopy with optical coherence tomography (OCT) for the detection of diabetic foveal edema.Study participants consisted of a convenient cohort of consecutive patients with diabetes mellitus seen at the Wilmer Eye Institute's Retinal Vascular Center, Baltimore, MD. Case characteristics were recorded and eyes were examined by 1 of 4 retina specialists by means of contact lens biomicroscopy. Edema involving the center of the macula was assessed as definitely present, questionably present, or definitely not present. The OCT testing was performed and interpreted by trained technicians, masked to the physicians' assessment of foveal edema. Agreement between OCT and contact lens examination for the absence or presence of foveal edema was evaluated.One hundred seventy-two eyes of 95 patients with diabetes were enrolled in August and September 2002. Foveal thickness was objectively measured by OCT in 170 (99%) of 172 cases. We found excellent agreement between OCT and contact lens examination for the absence or presence of foveal edema when OCT thickness was normal (<or=200 microm) or moderately to severely increased (>300 microm). However, agreement was poor when foveal thickness was mildly increased on OCT (201-300 microm).Agreement between contact lens examination and OCT for the detection of diabetic foveal edema is poor when OCT thickening is mild. This suggests that contact lens biomicroscopy is relatively insensitive for the detection of mild foveal thickening apparent on OCT. Additional studies are needed to investigate the natural course of cases with mildly increased foveal thickness on OCT that do not appear thickened clinically.Diabetic macular edema: correlation between microperimetry and optical coherence tomography findings.To compare the changes in macular sensitivity (microperimetry) and macular thickness with different degrees of diabetic macular edema.Sixty-one eyes of 32 consecutive diabetic patients were included in this cross-sectional study. All included eyes underwent functional and morphologic examination of the macular area. Best corrected visual acuity (ETDRS charts), macular sensitivity, and macular thickness were quantified. Lesion-related macular sensitivity and retinal fixation were investigated with an advanced, automatic microperimeter. Optical coherence tomography (OCT) was used to quantify macular thickness.The 61 included eyes were graded, by two retinal specialists, for diabetic macular edema as follows: 16 were graded as no macular edema (NE), 30 as non-clinically significant macular edema (NCSME), and 15 as clinically significant macular edema (CSME). Macular thickness significantly increased from the NE to the CSME group (P<0.0001), whereas macular sensitivity significantly decreased from the NE to the CSME group (P<0.0021). A significant correlation coefficient was noted between retinal sensitivity and normalized macular thickness (r=-0.37, P<0.0001). Linear regression analysis showed a decrease of 0.83 dB (P<0.0001) for every 10% of deviation of retinal thickness from normal values. Visual acuity and central macular sensitivity correlated significantly in the NCSME group (r=-0.6, P=0.0008), but not in the NE (r=-0.144, P=0.6) or in the CSME (r=-0.46, P=0.11) groups.Macular edema may be better documented by adding macular sensitivity mapping by microperimetry to macular thickness measurement by OCT and visual acuity determination because macular sensitivity seems to be a relevant explanatory variable of visual function, independent of macular thickness data. Moreover, microperimetry may be of value in predicting the outcome of diabetic macular edema, because it incorporates a functional measure that may supplement the predictive value of OCT and visual acuity.Diabetic macular edema assessed with optical coherence tomography and stereo fundus photography.To compare retinal thickening in diabetic macular edema assessed subjectively by evaluation of stereo fundus photographs with that assessed objectively by optical coherence tomography (OCT).Forty-degree stereo fundus photographs of the macular field and OCT scans in 84 eyes of 47 patients with diabetes were compared in terms of both location and area of retinal thickening. Six radiating 6-mm OCT scans at intervals of 30 degrees were obtained, and the retinal thickness was compared with the mean retinal thickness +/- 2 SD of healthy control subjects (33 eyes). Subsequently, retinal thickness was mapped topographically and the subjectively assessed retinal thickening map was overlaid. The degree of agreement on location was evaluated as retinal thickening present or absent in nine subfields of the fundus. Area of retinal thickening was divided into four categories: no retinal thickening, less than 1 disc area (DA), less than 2 DAs, or less than 3 DAs, expressed as the kappa statistic.Exact agreement on location was found in 676 of 756 (84 x 9) observations (89.4%; kappa = 0.69; 95% confidence interval [CI]: 0.63-0.75). Two eyes in which both methods assessed the same amount of retinal thickening showed no agreement on location. These eyes were compared only in terms of location. Exact agreement on area was found in 69 (84.1%) of 82 eyes. Weighted kappa (kappa(w)) = 0.79; 95% CI: 0.76-0.82).The degree of agreement between subjectively and objectively assessed retinal thickening was very good, implying that changes in diabetic macular edema can be accurately and prospectively measured with OCT.Optical coherence tomographic reflectivity of photoreceptors beneath cystoid spaces in diabetic macular edema.To investigate the relationship between the cystoid spaces in the outer plexiform layer (OPL) and the characteristics of the photoreceptors beneath the cystoid spaces in patients with diabetic macular edema (DME).In this observational cross-sectional study, 123 eyes of 96 consecutive patients with clinically significant macular edema were retrospectively reviewed. The characteristics of the photoreceptors on optical coherence tomography (OCT) images represented by the external limiting membrane (ELM) and the junction between inner and outer segments (IS/OS), and their association with the overlying cystoid spaces were investigated.The areas beneath the cystoid spaces in the OPL had a longer transverse length of disrupted or faint IS/OS and disrupted ELM lines than those without cystoid spaces (P < 0.001, P < 0.001, and P = 0.009). The IS/OS lines beneath the cystoid spaces had higher reflectivity than those in areas without cystoid spaces (P < 0.001). Enlarged cystoid spaces extending from the inner nuclear layer to the OPL were associated with disrupted IS/OS or ELM but not faint IS/OS (P < 0.001, P < 0.001, and P = 0.467). The transverse length of disrupted IS/OS at the fovea was correlated with the logarithm of the minimum angle of resolution (logMAR) more than the association between foveal thickness and logMAR (r = 0.49, P < 0.001 vs. r = 0.28, P = 0.002). The ELM descended to the RPE more frequently in eyes with single-lobulated fluorescein pooling in the foveal avascular zone than those with multi-lobulated pooling (P < 0.001).OCT showed that the cystoid spaces in the OPL were accompanied by photoreceptor damage beneath the cystoid spaces in DME.Macular thickness measured by optical coherence tomography (OCT) in diabetic patients.1) To compare macular thickness (MT) by optical coherence tomography (OCT) in diabetics and controls; 2) to assess the relationship between MT and stage of diabetic retinopathy (DR) and macular edema (ME); 3) to quantify MT changes after laser treatment for ME.One-hundred and thirty-seven patients with diabetes mellitus (216 eyes) were admitted to the study and examined by stereo-color fundus photos, retinal fluorangiography and OCT. DR was classified as: 1) no DR (46 eyes: 21.3%); 2) background DR (66 eyes: 30.6%); 3) pre-proliferative DR (50 eyes: 23.1%); 4) proliferative DR (54 eyes: 25%). The study group was then divided into three ME groups: 1) no edema (65 eyes: 30.1%); 2) not clinically significant ME (no CSME) (45 eyes: 20.8%); 3) clinically significant macular edema (CSME) (106 eyes: 49.1%). Three-month follow-up tomograms were taken to evaluate eyes laser-treated only for ME. The control group consisted of 50 eyes of 50 non-diabetic, age- and sex-matched subjects.MT was 369.3 +/- 163.2 microm in diabetics and 161.9 +/- 12.9 microm in controls (p < 0.001). In the four DR groups it was: 1) 211.0 +/- 37.6 microm; 2) 370.8 +/- 159.6 microm; 3) 419.1 +/- 138.2 microm; 4) 456.1 +/- 162.0 microm (p<0.001). In the three ME groups, MT was: 1)227.8 +/- 53.4 microm; 2) 321.8 +/- 124.2 microm; 3) 476.2 +/-146.6 microm (p < 0.001). In the 52 eyes treated with laser photocoagulation of the posterior pole only and with a follow-up > 3 months, MT before and after treatment was 468.2 +/- 83. 17 microm and 372.1 +/- 120.63 microm.MT was greater in diabetics than controls and tended to increase with DR and ME severity. OCT is a sensitive technique for detecting early diabetic macular abnormalities and quantifying their reduction after laser treatment.Association between hyperreflective foci in the outer retina, status of photoreceptor layer, and visual acuity in diabetic macular edema.To determine if hyperreflective foci in the outer retina are associated with photoreceptor integrity and the logarithm of minimal angle of resolution (logMAR) visual acuity (VA) in patients with diabetic macular edema (DME).Retrospective, observational, cross-sectional study.Patients (n=76; 108 eyes) with clinically relevant macular edema and no serous retinal detachment were analyzed retrospectively. Spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) images were obtained for all patients. We investigated the relationship between the hyperreflective foci in the outer retinal layers of the external limiting membrane (ELM) at the fovea and the photoreceptor integrity and VA.SD-OCT showed that 58 eyes (53.7%) had hyperreflective foci in the outer retinal layers, and 107 eyes (99.1%) had hyperreflective foci in the inner retinal layers. The logMAR VA was significantly (P<.0001) worse in eyes with hyperreflective foci in the outer retinal layers than in eyes without them (0.463±0.382 vs 0.127±0.206, respectively). Disruption of the ELM line on OCT was significantly (P<.0001, for both comparisons) associated with both hyperreflective foci in the outer retinal layers and poor logMAR VA. Disruption of the junction of the inner and outer segment line (IS/OS) also was related to hyperreflective foci in the outer retinal layers and poor logMAR VA (P<.0001 for both comparisons).The presence of hyperreflective foci in the outer retina is closely associated with a disrupted ELM and IS/OS line on SD-OCT images and decreased VA in DME.Patterns of diabetic macular edema with optical coherence tomography.We report cross-sectional images of diabetic macular edema and correlation between tomographic features and visual acuity with best correction by means of optical coherence tomography.In a prospective study, optical coherence tomography was performed in 59 eyes of 42 patients with diabetic macular edema and in 10 eyes of 10 normal control subjects.Optical coherence tomography showed three patterns of structural changes in diabetic macular edema: sponge-like retinal swelling (52 [88%] of 59 eyes), cystoid macular edema (28 [47%] of 59 eyes), and serous retinal detachment (9 [15%] of 59 eyes). Some eyes had more than one pathologic change. Retinal swelling was more pronounced in the outer rather than the inner retinal layers. Cystoid macular edema was located mainly in the outer retinal layers. In eyes with long-standing cystoid macular edema, cystoid spaces had fused, resulting in a large cystoid cavity involving almost the entire retinal layer. Hard exudates were seen as highly reflective areas located in the outer retinal layers. The retinal thickness at the central fovea and the visual acuity with best correction showed an intermediate negative correlation in eyes without cystoid macular edema (correlation coefficient: -0.61, P < .01).Diabetic macular edema involved three structural changes, including sponge-like retinal swelling (88%), cystoid macular edema (47%), and serous retinal detachment (15%). Visual acuity with best correction moderately correlated with retinal thickness regardless of the different tomographic features.Retinal thickness in diabetic retinopathy: comparison of optical coherence tomography, the retinal thickness analyzer, and fundus photography.Optical coherence tomography (OCT) and the retinal thickness analyzer (RTA) have proved their ability to measure retinal thickness in healthy subjects and diabetics reliably. In the present study, both techniques were compared for the same study population of diabetic patients, and the findings were related to macular edema shown by stereo fundus photography (SFP).Maculas of 124 eyes from 69 patients with diabetes mellitus were examined with OCT and the RTA. Measurements of retinal thickness were compared with signs of macular edema shown by SFP. For each eye, nine different sectors were analyzed (a foveal sector, four parafoveal sectors, and four extrafoveal sectors). Thirteen eyes with a normal macula served as controls. Sensitivity and specificity of detecting clinically significant macular edema (CSME) were calculated.Of 111 eyes, 64 showed signs of CSME by SFP. Mean retinal thickness +/- SD of the foveal sector was 249 +/- 104 microm by RTA and 295 +/- 124 microm by OCT measurements. There was a moderate overall correlation between OCT and the RTA (r = 0.66). The correlation was best in the foveal sector (r = 0.82). Overall correlation with SFP was better for OCT (r = 0.77) than for the RTA (r = 0.62). Sensitivity of detecting CSME was consistently higher with OCT, while the RTA showed higher specificity.Both measuring techniques yielded similar results when examining eyes of patients with diabetes, although absolute values differed. OCT seems to be more suitable in the clinical screening for macular edema due to its high sensitivity (>90%) with appropriate analysis parameters. The RTA is more prone to erroneous or missing thickness readings particularly under difficult measuring conditions.A systematic correlation of angiography and high-resolution optical coherence tomography in diabetic macular edema.To correlate leakage patterns in fluorescein angiography (FA) images and retinal morphologic features in high-definition optical coherence tomography (HD OCT) images in diabetic macular edema.Prospective pilot study and case series.Nine consecutive patients (10 eyes) with diabetic macular edema.All patients were examined using FA (HRA 2; Heidelberg Engineering) and HD OCT (Carl Zeiss Meditec; resolution, 512x128 pixels, 5.8x5.8 mm, and high-resolution scans consisting of 4096 A scans) on the same day. Using Adobe Photoshop (CS2 Version 9.0; Adobe Systems Incorporated, San Jose, CA) a grid containing 15x7 fields was superimposed on the HD OCT en face image and a late-phase FA image according to retinal landmarks. In each patient, a standardized analysis of 105 subfields was performed to provide a characterization of the type of vascular leakage in FA and the associated retinal morphologic changes in corresponding locations.Angiographic leakage type and structural alteration in retinal morphologic features in OCT.There was a high consistency between FA and OCT in the petaloid pattern of hyperfluorescence that correlated with the presence of large cystic spaces in the outer nuclear layer (ONL) and the outer plexiform layer (OPL) with or without subretinal fluid in 30.4% and 69.6% of graded fields, respectively. A honeycomblike pattern of hyperfluorescence was associated with swelling and cystic spaces in ONL, OPL, the inner nuclear, and the inner plexiform layer in 71.4% of graded fields. Diffuse patterns of hyperfluorescence did not correlate with characteristic retinal changes in HD OCT, but rather showed diversity in the type of morphologic alteration. The presence of central fluid pooling, such as subretinal fluid, could be identified only by HD OCT and not by FA.In the examined patients, a petaloid pattern and a honeycomb pattern of hyperfluorescence observed in FA were found to correlate to characteristic changes in HD OCT, whereas a diffuse leakage pattern was associated with nonuniform changes in retinal morphologic features.The author(s) have no proprietary or commercial interest in any materials discussed in this article.